Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 3. Policemen Pensions and Death Benefits

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

60A Am. Jur. 2d Pensions §§ 1166 to 1173.

Disciplinary suspension of public employee as affecting computation of length of service for retirement for pension purposes, 6 ALR2d 506.

What constitutes “salary,” “wages,” “pay,” etc., within pension law basing benefits thereon, 14 ALR2d 634.

Cause or connection between policeman's performance of official duties and his disability for purpose of recovering disability benefits, 27 ALR2d 974.

Validity of legislation providing for additional retirement or disability allowances for policemen previously retired or disabled, 27 ALR2d 1442.

Validity or repeal of modification of pension statute provisions, 52 ALR2d 437.

Misconduct of one seeking pension or on account of whose services pension is sought, as warranting denial of application therefor, 76 ALR2d 566.

63 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 524 to 532.

§ 15-5-301.
Pension fund; establishment; separate accounts.

The governing body of any city or town maintaining a paid police department and having a population of more than four thousand (4,000), after ten (10) days published notice and a public hearing thereon, may establish a policemen pension fund. Any such fund established prior to July 1, 1981 shall be divided into two (2) separate accounts to be known as the existing account and the new account. The existing account shall consist of contributions from police officers employed prior to July 1, 1981 and city or town contributions made in those officers’ behalf. The new account shall consist of contributions made from police officers employed after June 30, 1981 and city or town contributions made in those officers’ behalf.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 314; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-314; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-220; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 97, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009,
deleted “in the last federal census” following “more than four thousand (4,000)” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2002, ch. 82, § 4, provides:

“(a)

Except for the city of Cheyenne as provided under subsection (b) of this section, each city, town or county with law enforcement officers covered under the Wyoming retirement system or under a police pension fund established pursuant to W.S.

15-5-301

through

15-5-314

shall on or before June 30, 2003 transfer the covered officers for coverage under W.S.

9-3-432

or ensure retirement system coverage for its officers under W.S.9-3-432, as applicable, as of the date of entry or expansion of coverage. In addition, all assets of any police pension fund shall be transferred by the city, town or county to the retirement system not later than the date of entry into the system.

“(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the police pension fund of the city of Cheyenne shall be transferred to the retirement system on or before June 30, 2004, for purposes of W.S.

9-3-432

and

9-3-401

through

9-3-431

, as applicable, provided the city pays for any liability created under W.S.

15-5-301

through

15-5-314

and for coverage of officers under the retirement system prior to the date of transfer.

“(c)

Coverage of Wyoming law enforcement academy instructors, investigators of the Wyoming livestock board and Wyoming correctional officers under W.S.

9-3-432

as created by section 1 of this act, and the transfer of law enforcement officers covered under a police pension fund of a city, town or county to coverage under W.S.

9-3-432

, as created by section 1 of this act, shall not be implemented by the Wyoming retirement board until funds payable to the Wyoming retirement system are received as required by this section for deposit into the retirement account, as necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding all liability arising under this act, for years of service prior to the date of entry or expansion of coverage.

“(d)

In addition to subsection (c) of this section, W.S.9-3-4322, as created by section 1 of this act, shall not be implemented by the Wyoming retirement board until funds necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding any liability arising under this act, are deposited into the Wyoming retirement account, and contributions required under W.S. 9-3-432(a) and (b), as created under section 1 of this act, are paid to the Wyoming retirement system for deposit into the retirement account for at least two (2) months of covered service following the date of entry or expansion of expansion of coverage, as applicable.”

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 7, directs that for purposes of the act, the Wyoming retirement system is separated into two systems for accounting and actuarial purposes and creates the Wyoming Law Enforcement Retirement System for purposes of benefits and funding created by this act which shall be maintained and administered separately from the Wyoming retirement system.

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 5 states that it is the intention of the legislature because the benefits of the law enforcement pension account are mandated by state law, that the state of Wyoming fund the unfunded accrued liability of the account. The unfunded liability is to be amortized over a 20-year period with annual payments by the state to be in an actuarially determined amount.

§ 15-5-302.
Pension fund; contributions; salary deductions; unfunded liability; city or town and state responsibilities; adjustment of contributions.

The city or town shall contribute annually to the existing account an actuarially determined amount which combined with the police officers’ contributions, or contributions made on his behalf, will be sufficient to meet the normal costs of the account. The proceeds from the contribution shall be placed with the city treasurer in the existing account within the policemen pension fund. In addition, in accordance with subsection (f) of this section, the city treasurer may deduct from the salary of each police officer employed prior to July 1, 1981, an amount not to exceed eight percent (8%) of the monthly compensation payable to that officer and, if deducted, shall place it in the existing account within the policemen pension fund. In lieu of deducting from the salary of each police officer the amount specified in this subsection, the city treasurer may, upon approval by the governing body of the city or town, contribute a like amount into the policemen pension fund.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the city treasurer may deduct from the salary of each police officer employed after June 30, 1981 an amount specified by the board, which shall be actuarially determined. Each city or town shall contribute an amount equal to the amount contributed by each police officer, or by the city or town on behalf of the police officer, under this subsection. All contributions under this subsection shall be deposited in the new account within the policemen pension fund.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

In addition to other contributions imposed under this section, each city or town and each police officer shall contribute an equal amount to the account, specified by the board, which shall be actuarially determined, to meet the costs to the account for providing benefits under W.S.

15-5-309

.

Annually, not later than November 1, based on an actuarial determination in writing, the board shall notify the city treasurer in writing of the amount of contributions to deduct from the salary of each police officer specified in subsection (a) of this section. Contributions shall be adjusted effective January 1 following, and in accordance with, the board’s notice to the city treasurer. The contributions shall remain in effect for the next succeeding calendar year. In no case shall contributions be less than eight percent (8%) in any year, if the fund is not funded one hundred percent (100%) on an actuarial basis as certified to the board in writing by an enrolled actuary.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 315; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-315; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-221; Laws 1979, ch. 84, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 97, § 1; 1985, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 159, § 1; 1991, ch. 71, § 1; 1994, ch. 15, § 309; 1996, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 39, § 1; 2001, ch. 34, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (c) and (d), pertaining to obsolete provisions.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “salary,” “wages,” “pay,” or the like, within pension law basing benefits thereon, 91 ALR5th 225.

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 15-5-303.
Pension board; composition; election and term of police members.

If a policemen pension fund is established, the governing body and three (3) members elected from the police department constitute the policemen pension board to manage the fund as provided in this article. The police department shall elect three (3) regular qualified members to the board every two (2) years. The election shall be held in the police headquarters on a date fixed by the secretary of the board, but not more than thirty (30) nor less than fifteen (15) days before the regular municipal election. Written notice of the nomination of any member of the department for membership on the board shall be filed with the secretary of the board. Each notice of nomination shall be signed by not less than three (3) members of the department, and any member may sign more than three (3) notices of nomination. Notice of the dates upon which notices of nomination may be filed and for the election shall be given by the secretary of the board by posting a written notice in a prominent place in the police department headquarters. The secretary shall furnish printed or typewritten ballots containing the names of all persons nominated for membership and a ballot box for the election. The chief of the department shall appoint two (2) members of the department to act as officials of the election, and they shall receive their regular wages for the day, but no additional compensation. The polls shall open at 8:00 a.m. and remain open as long thereafter, not exceeding twelve (12) hours, as will afford each member of the department an opportunity to vote. Each member of the police department is entitled to vote for three (3) persons as board members. The three (3) nominees receiving the highest number of votes are elected as members of the board, and their terms commence on the same date as does the term of the mayor of the city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 316; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-316; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-222; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-5-304.
Pension board; officers; reports; information.

The mayor is ex officio chairman of the board, and the members of the board shall elect the other necessary officers. The secretary of the board shall make annual reports to the governing body on the condition of the fund, the receipts and disbursements thereto, together with a complete list of the beneficiaries of the fund, and the amount paid to each. The city treasurer, from the records of his office, shall furnish the secretary with any pertinent information needed to compile the reports or to furnish the board with necessary information.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 317; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-317; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-223; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-5-305.
Pension board; meetings; record and quorum; list of entitled pensioners; vouchers.

The board shall meet at least once each month as scheduled by the board and otherwise upon the call of the chairman. It shall keep a record of its proceedings, which is a public record. A majority of all the members of the board constitutes a quorum with the power to transact business.

At each monthly meeting the board shall send to the treasurer of the city or town a list of all persons entitled to payment from the fund, stating the amount and purpose of the payments. The list shall be certified to and signed by the chairman and secretary of the board, attested under oath, and shall be filed by the treasurer in his office as a permanent record. The treasurer of the city or town shall then make out a regular city voucher for each of the persons named in the list, or a city voucher in the manner payrolls are handled in cities with the commission form of government, for the amounts specified, showing the purpose for which it is granted. The vouchers, without further individual certification, shall be approved by the governing body for payment from the available funds of the pension fund at the next meeting at which vouchers are handled. The vouchers shall be paid in the same manner in which other claims against the city or town are paid.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 318; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-318; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-224; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1991, ch. 22, § 1.

§ 15-5-306.
Board powers and duties.

The board has the power to compel witnesses to attend and testify before it upon all matters connected with the operation of this article in the same manner as provided by law for the taking of testimony in courts of record in this state. The chairman or any member of the board may administer oaths to witnesses.

The board may provide for the payment from the fund of all necessary expenses and printing not to exceed five percent (5%) of the annual revenue. However, no compensation or emolument may be paid to any member of the board for any duty required or performed under this article.

The board may make all necessary rules and regulations for its guidance in conformity with the provisions of this article.

Upon recommendation of the board the governing body of each city or town may hire a professional investment counselor or management firm to make recommendations on the investment of monies in the fund, which may be invested in any securities specified in W.S. 9-3-408(b). The cost of such counselor or firm shall be paid from the fund.

The board shall:

At least once in every six (6) year period cause an actuarial valuation of the accounts within the fund to be made;

At least every two (2) years cause an actuarial investigation of all the experience under the accounts within the fund to be made;

Pay out of funds which shall be provided by the cities or towns the cost of the valuations and investigations under paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection;

Reduce employee and employer contribution rates under W.S. 15-5-302(b), in an amount to be actuarially determined, if at any time the assets in the existing or new accounts of the fund exceed the liabilities in those accounts.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 319; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-319; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-225; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 97, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (e)(ii), deleted “Commencing in 1983 and” at the beginning, and made a stylistic change.

§ 15-5-307.
Retirement age; length of service; pension amounts; leaving service early; benefit adjustment.

When any person duly appointed or selected and sworn as a member in any capacity or rank, other than department chief, of the police department of any city or town subject to the provisions of this article becomes sixty (60) years of age, the board shall order that person retired from further service. When any person has served twenty (20) years with the same police department, he may retire at that time, although not sixty (60) years of age, except that any person employed after June 30, 1981 shall serve for twenty (20) continuous years with the same department in order to be eligible for retirement prior to age sixty (60). When the board issues an order of retirement, it terminates the service of the person in the police department, except as provided in cases of emergency, and that person during his lifetime shall be paid a yearly pension equal to two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the average annual salary received during his highest paid five (5) year period, multiplied by the number of years service. However, no pension may exceed sixty-two and one-half percent (62 1/2%) of the average salary for the five (5) year period.

If for any reason the person leaves the service before completion of ten (10) years of service he shall receive in one (1) sum the amount without interest he has paid into the pension fund. After the completion of ten (10) years service he has the option of drawing out the money paid in or leaving it until he reaches the age of sixty (60) years and then being eligible to retire under the provisions of this section.

In addition to any other benefit provided by this section, each retired person shall receive a benefit of three percent (3%) per year for each full year that person has received retirement payments under this article prior to July 1, 1981.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 320; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-320; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-226; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 97, § 1; 1985, ch. 32, § 1; 1999, ch. 28, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Employer's liability, under state law, for fraud or misrepresentation inducing employee to take early retirement, 14 ALR5th 537.

§ 15-5-308.
Retirement age; physical disability; pension amounts; reinstatement.

If any person, while serving as a policeman is physically disabled as a result of any bodily injury received in the immediate or direct performance or discharge of his duties, the board, upon his written request filed with the secretary of the board, or without the written request if it deems it to be for the benefit of the public, shall retire that person from the department and order that he be paid from the fund during his lifetime a monthly pension equal to sixty-two and one-half percent (62 1/2%) of the amount of his regular monthly salary, effective at the time of his retirement. If the officer’s disability is off-duty related, the officer shall receive a monthly pension equal to fifty percent (50%) of his monthly salary effective at the time of his retirement. If the disability ceases, the pension shall cease, and the person shall be restored to active service at the existing salary of his position or rank at the time he is reinstated.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 71, § 2.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 321; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-321; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-227; Laws 1979, ch. 84, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1991, ch. 71, § 2.

“Disability.” —

An off-duty disability must be caused by bodily injury in order to qualify for the 50% pension; subsection (a) does not allow for an off-duty disability pension for a certified mental disability. Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Pension Bd., 986 P.2d 858,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1999).

Pre-existing depressive disorder excluded. —

Police officer with a pre-existing organically based depressive disorder which was exacerbated by police work and which ultimately became a disabling illness after ten years of employment did not qualify for a disability pension under this section. Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Pension Bd., 986 P.2d 858,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1999).

Officer's failure to request light duty excusable where previouslyinformed such duty unavailable. —

A police department cannot first inform an injured police officer that no light duty is available at the time the officer requests it, and thereby require him to use up his sick leave; later inform the officer that his options are either to apply for worker's compensation or a disability pension; and ultimately obtain the board's denial of disability pension, in part because he could have requested light duty but did not do so at a time when light duty was available. City of Cheyenne Policemen Pension Bd. v. Perreault, 727 P.2d 702,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 634

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Determination whether peace officer's disability is service-connected for disability pension purposes, 12 ALR4th 1158.

§ 15-5-309.
Death benefits; surviving spouse and children; amounts; length of payments; benefit adjustment.

Upon the death from any cause, of any person appointed or selected and sworn as a member in any capacity or rank of the police department of any city or town subject to the provisions of this article, the board shall pay a monthly pension of fifty percent (50%) of the deceased officer’s monthly salary out of the funds to his surviving spouse. The pension shall continue during her life or until she remarries. In addition, the board shall pay to the surviving spouse out of the fund six percent (6%) of the deceased officer’s monthly salary per month for the support and maintenance of each child of the deceased officer who is under eighteen (18) years of age and was supported by him prior to his death. The payments shall continue until the child becomes eighteen (18) years of age or marries.

If the police officer is retired and drawing his pension at the time of his death, and leaves a wife surviving, the board shall pay a monthly pension out of the fund to his surviving spouse equal to two-thirds (2/3) of the pension the retired police officer was receiving at the time of his death. In addition, the board shall pay to the surviving spouse or legal guardian sixty dollars ($60.00) per month out of the fund for the support and maintenance of each child of the deceased, retired officer who is under eighteen (18) years of age and was supported by him prior to his death. The payments shall continue until the child becomes eighteen (18) years of age or marries.

In addition to any other benefit provided by this section, each surviving spouse of a person who died while receiving retirement payments under this article shall receive a benefit of three percent (3%) for each full year that payments were made under this article prior to July 1, 1981 to both the retired person before death and the surviving spouse.

Effective July 1, 1987, any surviving spouse and any surviving child of any officer who died prior to July 1, 1979 while a sworn member of the police department of any city or town subject to this article shall receive a benefit in an amount as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 322; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-322; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-228; Laws 1979, ch. 84, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 159, § 1.

§ 15-5-310.
Examination of disabled retiree.

Any person retired for disability may be summoned by written notice to appear before the board at any time thereafter for examination as to his fitness for duty, and he shall abide by the decision and order of the board with reference thereto.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 323; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-323; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-229; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-5-311.
Benefits terminated upon felony conviction.

If any person receiving any benefit from the fund is convicted of a felony, the board shall order that the pension granted to that person immediately cease, and he shall receive no further pension allowance or benefit under this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 324; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-324; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-230; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-5-312.
Application for benefits; statement filed; determination; review.

If any policeman, his surviving wife, dependent children or dependent parents are entitled to any pension or benefits under this article, the policeman, or in the event of his death the dependent, shall apply for benefits or pension by filing a complete and concise statement of facts necessary to entitle the applicant to the benefits or pension. The application shall be filed with the board upon forms it provides. The board may investigate each application and determine whether benefits or pension should be granted. The board may also hear evidence as to the justice of the application, or require and receive affidavits as to the truth of the statements made therein. If the application is refused, the matter may be reviewed by the district court of the county in which the applicant resides pursuant to Rule 12 of the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 325; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-325; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-231; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-5-313.
Pension application; when payments made and benefits suspended; pension protections.

Application for pension may be made prior to actual retirement upon statement of the intention to retire, but payment shall not begin until the applicant has actually retired and his name is stricken from the payrolls of the city or town. Payments under this article shall be made to the pensioner or to his beneficiaries on or before the fifth day of each month by voucher drawn against the policemen pension fund as provided in W.S.

15-5-305

.

No policeman or any of his survivors is entitled to any benefits of this article while the policeman or his survivors are receiving payments under the Worker’s Compensation Act [§

27-14-101

et seq.], but when payments under the Worker’s Compensation Act terminate, the pensions of this article attach.

The cash and securities while in the account created by this article are exempt from any state, county or municipal tax of this state, and are not subject to execution or attachment by trustee process or otherwise, in law or equity, or under any other process whatsoever, and are not assignable.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 326, 327; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-326, 15.1-327; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-5-232, 15-5-233; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1991, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 15-5-314.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 328; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-328; W.S. 1977, § 15-5-234; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.